Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.144

Combination of offices of treasurer with clerk—Powers of clerk.

In the event that the office of treasurer is combined with the office of clerk so as to become the office of clerk-treasurer, the clerk shall exercise all the powers vested in and perform all the duties required to be performed by the treasurer, and in cases where the law requires the treasurer to sign or execute any papers or documents, it shall not be necessary for the clerk to sign as treasurer, but shall be sufficient if he or she signs as clerk.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2051; 1969 c 116 s 4. Formerly RCW 35.24.144.]